Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2501
Act, how cited.

Sections 76-2501 to 76-2506 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Plane Coordinate System Act.

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 63;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1601;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 497.